Maryland, session 2026, HB1109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 3 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) “Health officer” means, unless expressly provided otherwise, the Baltimore
City Commissioner of Health or the health officer of a county.
2–104.1.
(A) BEFORE PROCURING A SYSTEM FOR COLLECTING AND STORING
ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS, AS DEFINED IN § 19–142 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENTS TO ASSESS THE
NECESSARY QUALITIES OF AN ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS SYSTEM.
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT PROCURES A SYSTEM FOR COLLECTING AND
STORING ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY EACH
HEALTH OFFICER FOR A COUNTY AND OFFER THE COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT
THE OPPORTUNITY TO JOIN THE PROCUREMENT.
SUBTITLE 11. MARYLAND MEDICAL RESERVE CORPS.
2–1101.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “CORPS” MEANS THE MARYLAND MEDICAL RESERVE
CORPS.
2–1102.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ORGANIZE THE MARYLAND MEDICAL
RESERVE CORPS.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE CORPS IS TO PROVIDE A STATEWIDE VOLUNTEER
NETWORK INTEGRATED INTO COMMUNITY EMERGENCY SYSTEMS TO FACILITATE A
COORDINATED APPROACH TO VOLUNTEER MANAGEMENT.
(C) THE CORPS SHALL INCLUDE CLINICAL AND NONCLINICAL PERSONNEL
CAPABLE OF ASSISTING DURING CRISES THAT STRAIN THE HEALTH CARE SYSTEM
OR PUBLIC HEALTH SYSTEM, INCLUDING PUBLIC HEALTH EMERGENCIES, DISEASE
OUTBREAKS, AND NATURAL DISASTERS.
2–1103.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN AN EFFICIENT AND MODERN ELECTRONIC
REGISTRATION SYSTEM TO REGISTER AND TRACK VOLUNTEERS FOR THE CORPS;
AND
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 190
(2) DESIGNATE A PUBLIC HEALTH EMERGENCY SURGE
COORDINATOR AMONG ITS STAFF TO COORDINATE AND PLAN IMPROVEMENTS TO
THE CORPS.
3–306.
(a) Except as provided by agreement between the Secretary and the local
governing body, and in addition to the powers and duties set forth elsewhere, each health
officer has the powers and duties set forth in this section.
(b) A health officer may obtain samples of food and drugs for analysis.
(c) (1) The health officer for a county is the executive officer and secretary of
the county board of health.
(2) (I) Except in Montgomery County, the health officer for a county
shall appoint the staff of the county health department.
(II) IF A POSITION WITH A COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT IS
FULLY FUNDED WITHOUT THE USE OF STATE FUNDING, THE HEALTH OFFICER FOR
THE COUNTY MAY APPOINT AN INDIVIDUAL TO THE POSITION WITHOUT APPROVAL
BY THE SECRETARY OR THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT.
(3) The health officer for a county shall have an office at an accessible place
in the county.
(4) (i) The health officer for a county shall enforce throughout the
county:
1. Under the direction of the Secretary, the State health laws
and the policies, rules, and regulations that the Secretary adopts; and
2. Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
under the direction of the county board of health, the rules and regulations that the county
board of health adopts.
(ii) The health officer for a county shall enforce in each municipality
or special taxing district in the county the rules or regulations that the county board of
health adopts unless the municipality or district has a charter provision or ordinance that:
1. Covers the same subject matter as the county rule or
regulation;
2. Is at least as restrictive as the county rule or regulation;
and
– 5 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. Includes provisions for enforcement.
(5) A health officer shall perform any investigation or other duty or
function directed by the Secretary or the county board of health and submit appropriate
reports to them.
(d) (1) Subject to the consent of the governing body of the county and the
written approval of the Secretary, a health officer for a county may enter into a contract or
any other written agreement to assist or participate in the delivery of health care services
with a person that is authorized to provide, finance, coordinate, facilitate, or otherwise
deliver health care services in the State.
(2) (I) IF THE SECRETARY DOES NOT RESPOND TO A REQUEST FOR
WRITTEN APPROVAL WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE REQUEST, THE HEALTH
OFFICER FOR THE COUNTY MAY ENTER THE CONTRACT OR WRITTEN AGREEMENT
THE SECRETARY MAY DELEGATE APPROVAL AUTHORITY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION TO THE DEPUTY SECRETARY FOR PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES.
(II) IF THE SECRETARY DELEGATES AUTHORITY TO THE
DEPUTY SECRETARY FOR PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPUTY SECRETARY MAY DELEGATE THE AUTHORITY TO
LOCAL HEALTH OFFICERS IF THE SECRETARY DOES NOT RESPOND TO A REQUEST
FOR WRITTEN APPROVAL WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE REQUEST, THE
HEALTH OFFICER FOR THE COUNTY MAY ENTER THE CONTRACT OR WRITTEN
AGREEMENT.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a health officer
for a county and the Baltimore City Commissioner of Health may authorize the county
health department to retain all collections, including any unspent balance at the end of a
fiscal year, received from:
(i) Fees authorized under this article;
(ii) Fees authorized under the Environment Article; and
(iii) Fees derived from charges authorized under Title 16, Subtitle 2
of this article.
(2) The authority to retain collections under paragraph (1) of this
subsection does not apply:
(i) To license fees set by a county governing body or Baltimore City
and paid to the chief financial officer of the county or Baltimore City as authorized under
State law;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 190
(ii) To fees that must be transferred to the General Fund under §
4–217(c) of this article from the fees collected for each birth certificate issued or report
issued that a search was made but the requested record is not on file; or
(iii) If the retention of collections would be inconsistent with
established local practice.
(3) Each health officer for a county and the Baltimore City Commissioner
of Health shall report annually to the Secretary on the use of collections retained under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(F) A HEALTH OFFICER FOR A COUNTY MAY SERVE ON THE BOARD OF A
HOSPITAL IN THE STATE AS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT
ONLY IF THE HEALTH OFFICER DOES NOT ACCEPT PAYMENT FOR THE HEALTH
OFFICER’S SERVICE ON THE BOARD.
[(f)] (G) The Secretary may delegate duties, powers, and functions as provided
in this article to a health officer for a county or other county official authorized to
administer and enforce health and environmental laws.
13–5102.
There is a Commission on Public Health.
13–5103.
(a) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) One member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) One member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
[(3)] (5) The Deputy Secretary for Public Health, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee;
– 7 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(4)] (6) The Deputy Secretary for [Behavioral Health] OPERATIONS, or
the Deputy Secretary’s designee;
[(5) The Director of the Office of Minority Health and Health Disparities, or
the Director’s designee; and]
(7) THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE CHESAPEAKE
REGIONAL INFORMATION SYSTEM FOR OUR PATIENTS (CRISP), OR THE CHIEF
EXECUTIVE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE; AND
[(6)] (8) The following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) Three local health officers of whom:
1. One shall be from a rural jurisdiction;
2. One shall be from a suburban jurisdiction; and
3. One shall be from an urban jurisdiction;
(ii) Two representatives from State academic institutions with
expertise in public health systems; AND
(iii) A faculty member from a public health program at a historically
Black college or university[; and].
[(iv)] (B) [At least three but not more than five] THE GOVERNOR
MAY APPOINT NOT MORE THAN TWO members of the public with [demonstrated interest]
EXPERIENCE in public health [and experience in at least one of the following areas:
1. Health equity;
2. Information technology;
3. Workforce; and
4. Population health] AS ADDITIONAL MEMBERS OF THE
COMMISSION.
[(b) In performing the duties of the Commission, the Commission shall consult
with, as appropriate and necessary:
(1) The Maryland Health Care Commission;
(2) The Health Services Cost Review Commission;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 190
(3) The Maryland Community Health Resources Commission;
(4) The Department of Budget and Management;
(5) The Department of General Services;
(6) The Maryland Department of Disabilities;
(7) The State–designated health data utility; and
(8) Any other State agency as appropriate.]
(c) (1) The Commission [shall] MAY establish [the following] workgroups[:
(i) Funding;
(ii) Governance and organizational capabilities;
(iii) Workforce;
(iv) Data and information technology; and
(v) Communication and public engagement] AT THE DISCRETION
OF THE COMMISSION.
(2) [Each workgroup established under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall include:
(i) Two members of the Commission; and
(ii) Members of the public with relevant experience in the subject
matter of the workgroup who may include:
1. Primary and specialty care practitioners;
2. Payors;
3. Consumer advocates;
4. Hospital executives;
5. Safety net health care providers;
6. Public health practitioners;
– 9 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
7. Community–based organizations; and
8. Faith–based organizations] THE CHAIR OF THE
COMMISSION MAY APPOINT MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC TO A WORKGROUP.
[(3) The purpose of the workgroups established under paragraph (1) of this
subsection is to foster broad engagement and provide expertise for the purpose of informing
the work and recommendations of the Commission.]
(d) To the extent practicable and consistent with federal and State law, the
membership of the Commission and workgroups established under this section shall reflect
the racial, ethnic, and gender diversity of the State.
(e) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE Commission
shall [be cochaired by:
(1) One member appointed under subsection (a)(6)(i) of this section,
designated by the Governor;
(2) One member appointed under subsection (a)(6)(ii) of this section,
designated by the Governor; and
(3) The member appointed under subsection (a)(6)(iii) of this section]
SELECT A CHAIR AND A VICE CHAIR FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
(2) TO QUALIFY TO SERVE AS CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION, THE
MEMBER MUST AGREE TO PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION ON SELECTION AS
CHAIR.
(3) THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION MAY NOT SELECT AS CHAIR
A MEMBER LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A)(3), (4), (5), OR (6) OF THIS SECTION.
(f) A member of the Commission:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
13–5104.
(A) The [academic institutions represented by the cochairs] CHAIR of the
Commission shall provide staff support for the Commission.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 190
(B) IF THE CHAIR FAILS TO PROVIDE STAFFING FOR THE COMMISSION, THE
MEMBERS SHALL SELECT A NEW CHAIR IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–5103(E) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
13–5105.
(A) The purpose of the Commission is to make recommendations to improve the
delivery of foundational public health services in the State.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE OVERSIGHT OVER GUIDANCE FOR
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE COMMISSION’S RECOMMENDATIONS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE AN UPDATE REGARDING THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE COMMISSION’S RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
COMMISSION EACH QUARTER.
13–5106.
(a) The Commission shall assess the foundational public health capabilities of the
Department and local health departments in the State.
(b) (1) In conducting the assessment required under subsection (a) of this
section, the Commission shall:
(i) Explain the impact of the foundational public health capabilities
on the State’s ability to address foundational public health areas, including as the
foundational public health areas relate to behavioral health;
(ii) Explain the impact of the foundational public health capabilities
on the State’s ability to respond to COVID–19, overdoses, maternal and infant mortality,
and other major public health challenges as appropriate; and
(iii) Provide public outreach to hold at least three public meetings in
different areas of the State that include an opportunity for public comment.
(2) In conducting the assessment required under subsection (a) of this
section, the Commission may:
(i) Request deidentified and publicly available data from the
Department, local health departments, and the State–designated health data utility; and
(ii) Request interviews with State and local health officials.
(c) (1) Based on the assessment conducted under subsection (a) of this section,
the Commission shall make recommendations for reform in the following areas:
– 11 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Organization of State and local public health departments;
(ii) Information technology, information exchange, and data and
analytics;
(iii) Workforce, including human resources and use of the [medical
reserve corps for public health] MARYLAND MEDICAL RESERVE CORPS ESTABLISHED
UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 11 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(iv) Procurement, including oversight of contractors;
(v) Funding;
(vi) Communication and public engagement; and
(vii) Any other area considered appropriate by the Commission.
(2) The recommendations made under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall include the funding or legislation required to implement the recommendation, if any.
(3) The Commission shall justify each recommendation made under
paragraph (1) of this subsection based on how the recommendation contributes to the
provision of foundational public health services.
(4) (i) The Commission shall make a draft of its recommendations
available for public comment for 30 days.
(ii) The final report of the Commission shall include a response to
any substantive public comment received on the draft recommendations.
(5) (i) The Commission shall use best efforts to reach consensus on its
recommendations.
(ii) If the Commission cannot reach consensus on its
recommendations, the Commission shall include the opportunity for dissenting comments
in the Commission’s final report.
13–5107.
[(a)] On or before [December 1, 2023] JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, the Commission
shall submit [an interim] A report ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF ITS
RECOMMENDATIONS AND BARRIERS TO IMPLEMENTATION to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee, the Senate Finance Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the
House Health [and Government Operations] Committee.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 190
[(b) On or before December 1, 2024, the Commission shall submit an interim
report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the
Senate Finance Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House Health
and Government Operations Committee.
(c) On or before October 1, 2025, the Commission shall submit a final report of its
findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate Finance
Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House Health and Government
Operations Committee.]
13–5602.
(a) There is a Population Health Improvement Fund.
(f) (1) Subject to [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this subsection,
the Fund may be used only for expenses associated with statewide population health
improvement initiatives in alignment with the statewide health equity plan as directed by
the Secretary.
(2) Activities paid for by the Fund must support the goal of meeting the
statewide population health targets outlined in the AHEAD Model State Agreement with the
Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services and have at least one of the following functions:
(i) Reducing rates of common preventable health conditions;
(ii) Addressing health–related social needs; or
(iii) Reducing or eliminating health disparities.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE HEALTH SERVICES COST REVIEW
COMMISSION MAY, IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE AHEAD MODEL STATE
AGREEMENT, TRANSFER MONEY FROM THE FUND TO THE PUBLIC HEALTH
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 24–2802 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
SUBTITLE 28. PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FUND.
24–2801.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “FUND” MEANS THE PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT FUND.
– 13 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
24–2802.
(A) THERE IS A PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT THE EDUCATION AND
TRAINING OF THE PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE.
(C) THE MARYLAND COMMUNITY HEALTH RESOURCES COMMISSION SHALL
ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND;
(3) ANY MONEY TRANSFERRED FROM THE POPULATION HEALTH
IMPROVEMENT FUND UNDER § 13–5602 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR THE
BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO SUPPORT THE EDUCATION AND
TRAINING OF THE PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 190
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the State
Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to receive
interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General Fund of
the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
FUND.
13–5602.
(a) There is a Population Health Improvement Fund.
(f) (1) Subject to [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this subsection,
the Fund may be used only for expenses associated with statewide population health
improvement initiatives in alignment with the statewide health equity plan as directed by
the Secretary.
(2) Activities paid for by the Fund must support the goal of meeting the
statewide population health targets outlined in the AHEAD Model State Agreement with
the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services and have at least one of the following
functions:
(i) Reducing rates of common preventable health conditions;
(ii) Addressing health–related social needs; or
(iii) Reducing or eliminating health disparities.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE HEALTH SERVICES COST REVIEW
COMMISSION MAY TRANSFER MONEY FROM THE FUND TO THE PUBLIC HEALTH
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 24–2802 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
– 15 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SUBTITLE 28. PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FUND.
24–2801.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “FUND” MEANS THE PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT FUND.
24–2802.
(A) THERE IS A PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT THE EDUCATION AND
TRAINING OF THE PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE.
(C) THE MARYLAND COMMUNITY HEALTH RESOURCES COMMISSION
SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND;
(3) ANY MONEY TRANSFERRED FROM THE POPULATION HEALTH
IMPROVEMENT FUND UNDER § 13–5602 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO SUPPORT THE EDUCATION AND
TRAINING OF THE PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 190
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE PUBLIC HEALTH WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
FUND.
Article – State Government
2–1505.3.
THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE, SHALL DEVELOP A PROCESS TO ASSESS THE
HEALTH EQUITY IMPACTS OF RELEVANT LEGISLATION.
21–203.
(a) (1) There is a Maryland Corps Program Advisory Board.
(2) The Advisory Board consists of the following members:
(i) a Board Chair, appointed by the Governor;
– 17 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) two members jointly appointed by the President of the Senate
and the Speaker of the House:
1. one of whom must represent a service organization in the
State; and
2. one of whom shall be:
A. a current participant in a public service program; or
B. a former participant in a public service program whose
participation ended during the preceding 3 years;
(iii) one member appointed by the President of the Senate;
(iv) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(v) [four] FIVE members appointed by the Governor[,]:
1. one of whom shall be a representative from the Maryland
State Service Commission; AND
2. ONE OF WHOM SHALL BE A HEALTH OFFICER, AS
DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(b) In making appointments to the Advisory Board, the President, Speaker, and
Governor shall consider:
(1) the professional or personal experience of the individual in community
or other service, nonprofit management, civic engagement, or volunteerism;
(2) the cultural, geographic, racial, ethnic, and gender diversity of the
State; and
(3) an individual’s experience and knowledge in workforce development,
including regional workforce needs, training, career development programming, and
workforce investment boards.
Chapter 385 of the Acts of 2023, as amended by Chapter 787 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2023. It shall remain effective for a period of [3] 5 years and 1 month and, at the end of
June 30, [2026] 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 190
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the Maryland Medical Reserve Corps required to be organized under §
2–1102 of the Health – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, replace the
Maryland Responds Health Reserve Corps.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) The Commission on Public Health, in consultation with the Maryland
Department of Health and the Health Services Cost Review Commission, shall establish a
community benefits modernization subcommittee.
(2) The subcommittee may include members and nonmembers of the
Commission.
(3) To the extent practicable, the membership of the subcommittee shall
reflect the racial, ethnic, and gender diversity of the State.
(b) The subcommittee shall:
(1) review federal and State requirements governing hospital community
benefit activities, including community health needs assessments and implementation
strategies, definitions of allowable activities, and reporting requirements;
(2) analyze a landscape assessment of other states’ community benefit
spending requirements and policies, including those related to the development of the
community health needs assessment and how implementation plans are operationalized;
(3) evaluate the scope and impact of community benefit activities
conducted by hospitals in the State, including the processes for local community health
needs assessment, implementation plan development and deployment, and trends in
spending per allowable category;
(4) identify gaps that exist between community benefit investment and
State and local health priority areas; and
(5) develop recommendations to:
(i) modernize the State’s community benefit spending standards,
policies, and reporting requirements while focusing on how to maximize community benefit
investment to meet State health improvement priorities; and
(ii) ensure alignment of community benefit with State health
improvement priorities, including statutory or regulatory changes, funding, and reporting
requirements to modernize the community benefits in the State.
– 19 –

Ch. 190 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) The Chair of the Commission on Public Health shall provide staffing for the
subcommittee.
(d) (1) On or before August 1, 2027, the subcommittee shall submit a report of
its findings and recommendations to the Commission on Public Health.
(2) On or before September 1, 2027, the Commission on Public Health shall
submit a report of the subcommittee’s findings and recommendations to the Governor and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the Senate Finance Committee, the House Appropriations
Committee, and the House Health Committee.
SECTION 4. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department
of Health shall convene a workgroup with representatives from the Department of Budget
and Management and up to five representatives of local health officers to review local
health department recruiting and classification processes and identify potential methods
for increasing efficiencies related to the processes.
SECTION 3. 5. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026. Section 3 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 6 months
and, at the end of June 30 December 31, 2027, Section 3 of this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 20 –